Illinois, session 104th, SB2700.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Mass Transit District Act is amended 5by changing Section 5.08 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 3610/5.08 new)7    Sec. 5.08. Transit-oriented developments and 8trail-oriented developments.9    (a) As used in this Section, "transit-oriented 10developments" and "trail-oriented developments" include, 11without limitation, residential, commercial, mixed-use, 12governmental, or institutional or childcare facilities that 13are located near a transit station, bus stop, transit hub, 14transit node, or trail. 15    (b) The board of trustees of any transit district may:16        (1) initiate transit-oriented developments and 17    trail-oriented developments;18        (2) partner with public bodies, private entities, 19    non-profit organizations, or institutions for the purpose 20    of these types of developments;21        (3) acquire real property or facilities for the 22    purpose of these types of developments;23        (4) own, maintain, design, construct, reconstruct,   SB2700- 2 -LRB104 15426 RTM 28581 b1    improve, repair, operate, or lease any facilities for the 2    purpose of these types of developments;3        (5) use funds and property for the purpose of these 4    types of developments; and5        (6) borrow money, issue bonds, apply for grants, and 6    enter into lease agreements or intergovernmental 7    agreements for the purpose of these types of developments.